Utah statutes.
72-4-304.   Exceptions to approval and segmentation requirements.

(1)  Legacy Parkway, from the junction of I-215 in Davis County northerly to the junction with US 89 and I-15:

(a)  is exempt from the legislative approval requirement in Section 72-4-301.5; and

(b)  may not be segmented.

(2)  A highway nominated for National Scenic Byway or All-American Road designation prior to January 1, 2009 is exempt from the legislative approval requirement in Section 72-4-301.5.



Enacted by Chapter 393, 2009 General Session

